Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 5. ELECTION SUPPLIES

CHAPTER 52. BALLOT FORM, CONTENT, AND PREPARATION

SUBCHAPTER A. PREPARING THE BALLOT

Sec. 52.001. OFFICIAL BALLOT. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the vote in an election is by official ballot.

(b) If an official ballot is unavailable at a polling place, the presiding election judge shall provide a ballot designed in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.002. AUTHORITY PREPARING BALLOT. Except as otherwise provided by law, the following authority shall have the official ballot prepared:

(1) for an election ordered by the governor or a county authority, the county clerk;

(2) for a primary election, the county chair of the political party holding the primary;

(3) for an election ordered by a city authority, the city secretary; and

(4) for an election ordered by an authority of a political subdivision other than a county or city, the secretary of the subdivision's governing body or, if the governing body has no secretary, the governing body's presiding officer.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 48, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 52.003. PLACING CANDIDATE'S NAME ON BALLOT. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the authority responsible for having the official ballot prepared shall have placed on the ballot the name of each candidate:

(1) who has filed with the authority an application for a place on the ballot that complies with the requirements as to form, content, and procedure that the application must satisfy for the candidate's name to be placed on the ballot; or

(2) whose entitlement to placement on the ballot has been lawfully certified to the authority.

(b) A candidate's name shall be placed on the ballot in the form indicated on the candidate's application or, if the application was not filed with the authority, in the form certified to the authority.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by law, in a runoff election, the authority shall have placed on the ballot the name of each candidate who is entitled to a place on the runoff ballot as indicated by the canvass for the main election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 52.004. FAILURE TO PLACE CANDIDATE'S NAME ON BALLOT. (a) A person commits an offense if the person is responsible for having the official ballot prepared for an election and knowingly fails to place on the ballot the name of a candidate who is entitled to have the candidate's name placed on the ballot.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 50, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 52.005. BALLOT CONTENT DETERMINED ACCORDING TO PRECINCT. The ballot for an election precinct may contain only those offices and propositions stating measures on which the qualified voters of the precinct are entitled to vote.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.006. CORRECTING BALLOT. (a) To make a necessary correction on the ballot, the authority responsible for having the official ballot prepared may:

(1) prepare new ballots;

(2) line out or otherwise obscure the language being corrected and enter in printed form the correct language next to the language being corrected, if necessary; or

(3) prepare printed or blank correction stickers to be affixed to the ballots.

(b) A correction sticker used under this section must be printed in the same type style and on the same color of paper as the ballot.

(c) A correction sticker may be affixed to a ballot only by the authority responsible for having the official ballot prepared or by an election officer serving a polling place.

(d) A vote may not be counted for a name appearing on a correction sticker unless the sticker is prepared and affixed to the ballot as provided by this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.0061. NOTICE OF CORRECTION BY AUTHORITY RESPONSIBLE FOR PREPARING BALLOT. (a) The authority responsible for having the official ballot prepared shall deliver written notice to the secretary of state not later than 24 hours after the authority's determination to prepare new ballots to make a correction on the ballot.

(b) The notice must include a statement of the nature of the correction to be made.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 289, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 52.0062. NOTICE OF CORRECTION BY CERTAIN PRINTERS. (a) Each person required to file a statement under Section 51.013 shall deliver written notice to the secretary of state not later than 48 hours after the person receives a request to prepare new ballots to make a correction on the ballot for a primary election or the general election for state and county officers.

(b) The notice must include the name, address, and telephone number of the person requesting the corrected ballots and a statement of the nature of the correction to be made.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 289, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 52.0063. UNLAWFUL PREPARATION OF BALLOTS. (a) A person commits an offense if the person knowingly prepares or causes to be prepared new ballots to make a correction on the ballot without complying with Section 52.0061 or 52.0062, as applicable.

(b) Except as authorized by Section 52.006, a person commits an offense if the person knowingly prepares or causes to be prepared for an election any ballot that contains the same number as a ballot that has been prepared for the election.

(c) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 289, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 52.0064. DESTRUCTION OF INCORRECT BALLOTS. (a) If new ballots are prepared to make a correction on the ballot, the authority responsible for having the official ballot prepared shall destroy the incorrect ballots in the presence of:

(1) the sheriff, in an election ordered by the governor or a primary election; or

(2) the authority responsible for ordering the election, in any other election.

(b) The authority responsible for having the official ballot prepared shall post in the authority's office a notice of the date, hour, and place of the destruction of the incorrect ballots. The notice must remain posted continuously for the 72 hours preceding the scheduled time of the destruction.

(c) Any interested person is entitled to be present at the destruction of incorrect ballots.

(d) The authority responsible for having the official ballot prepared shall prepare a record of the incorrect ballots that are destroyed. The authority shall preserve the record for the period for preserving the precinct election records.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 289, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 52.007. SPECIMEN BALLOT. (a) An official ballot for each ballot format used in each election shall be designated a specimen ballot.

(b) The specimen ballot shall be made available for public inspection:

(1) for an election other than a primary election, in the office of the authority responsible for having the official ballot prepared; or

(2) for a primary election, in the office of the county clerk.

(c) The specimen ballot shall be made available for public inspection as soon as practicable after the official ballots have been prepared for the election and shall be preserved for the period for preserving the precinct election records.

(d) The county chair of each political party holding a primary election shall deliver the ballots to be used as specimen ballots to the county clerk when the official ballots are received from the printer.

(e) The authority in whose office the specimen ballot is kept shall mark each specimen ballot with "SPECIMEN" in a manner that will not prevent the reading of its contents. If more than one ballot format is used in the election, the authority shall indicate on the specimen ballot the election precincts in which each ballot format is used.

(f) A specimen ballot may not be reproduced for distribution.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 51, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 52.008. SAMPLE BALLOT. (a) The authority responsible for procuring the election supplies shall have a supply of sample ballots printed.

(b) A sample ballot may be printed only on yellow paper. "SAMPLE BALLOT" shall be printed in large letters at the top of each sample ballot.

(c) Sample ballots shall be distributed for use in the election as directed by the authority responsible for procuring the election supplies.

(d) A sample ballot may not be cast or counted in an election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1315, Sec. 17, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

SUBCHAPTER B. NAME ON BALLOT

Sec. 52.031. FORM OF NAME ON BALLOT. (a) A candidate's name shall be printed on the ballot with the given name or initials first, followed by a nickname, if any, followed by the surname, in accordance with this section.

(a-1) A person may use any surname acquired by law or marriage.

(b) In combination with the surname, a candidate may use one or more of the following:

(1) a given name;

(2) a contraction or familiar form of a given name by which the candidate is known; or

(3) an initial of a given name.

(c) A nickname of one unhyphenated word of not more than 10 letters by which the candidate has been commonly known for at least three years preceding the election may be used in combination with a candidate's name. A nickname that constitutes a slogan or otherwise indicates a political, economic, social, or religious view or affiliation may not be used. A nickname may not be used unless the candidate executes and files with the application for a place on the ballot an affidavit indicating that the nickname complies with this subsection.

(d) A suffix such as "Sr.," "Jr.," or "2nd" may be used in combination with a candidate's name.

(e) A married woman or widow may use in combination with her surname, if the same as her husband's surname, the given name or initials of her husband with the prefix "Mrs."

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1098 (H.B. 2075), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 52.032. CANDIDATES WITH SAME OR SIMILAR SURNAMES. (a) If two or more candidates for the same office have the same or similar surnames, each of those candidates may have printed on the ballot a brief distinguishing description or title, not to exceed four words, following the candidate's name.

(b) The description or title may only refer to the candidate's place of residence or present or former profession, occupation, or position. However, the description or title may not refer to a public office.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 52.033. TITLES PROHIBITED. Except as otherwise provided by this subchapter, a title or designation of office, status, or position may not be used in conjunction with a candidate's name on the ballot.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.034. NAME ON BALLOT MORE THAN ONCE. A candidate's name may not appear more than once on the ballot except as a candidate for:

(1) two or more offices that are permitted by law to be held by the same person; or

(2) the office of president or vice-president of the United States and another office.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

SUBCHAPTER C. FORM OF BALLOT

Sec. 52.061. PRINTING ON BALLOT. (a) The ballot shall be printed in black ink on white or light-colored paper, but the ballot may not be the same color as sample ballots.

(b) The type on the ballot may vary in size and style for the office titles, column headings, names of candidates, proposition headings, and propositions, but the type for each particular category must be uniform.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 52.062. NUMBERING OF BALLOTS. The ballots prepared by each authority responsible for having the official ballot prepared shall be numbered consecutively beginning with the number "1."

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.063. DESIGNATION OF ELECTION AND DATE. A designation of the nature of the election and the date of the election shall be printed at the top of the ballot.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.064. DESIGNATION AS OFFICIAL BALLOT. "OFFICIAL BALLOT" shall be printed in large letters on the ballot immediately below the designation and date of the election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.065. ARRANGEMENT OF BALLOT WITH PARTY NOMINEE. (a) For an election in which a candidate's name is to appear on the ballot as the nominee of a political party, the ballot shall be arranged in vertical columns separated by parallel lines, as provided by this section.

(b) Each title of an office to be voted on shall be listed in the first column on the left of the ballot with "Candidates For:" printed at the top. The office titles shall be separated by parallel horizontal lines extending through each column on the ballot.

(c) The name of each political party with a nominee on the ballot shall be printed at the top of the second and as many succeeding columns as necessary. The name of the nominee of each party for each office shall appear opposite the office in the appropriate party column. The party columns shall be of uniform width.

(d) If the name of an independent candidate is to appear on the ballot, a column immediately following the party columns shall be provided, with "Independent" printed at the top. The name of each independent candidate shall appear in the column opposite the appropriate office title.

(e) If write-in votes are permitted by law in the election, a column immediately following the other columns shall be provided for write-in votes, with "Write-in" printed at the top. Adequate space shall be provided in the column for write-in votes.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.066. ARRANGEMENT OF BALLOT WITH NO PARTY NOMINEE. (a) For an election in which no party nominee is to appear on the ballot, the ballot shall be arranged as provided by this section.

(b) Each title of an office to be voted on shall be listed in a vertical column with the name of each candidate listed below the appropriate office title.

(c) If write-in votes are permitted by law in the election, a space underscored by a broken or solid line shall be provided for a write-in vote below the names of the candidates for each office. If more than one candidate is to be elected to an office, write-in spaces shall be provided in a number equal to the number of candidates to be elected.

(d) If the length of the ballot arranged as one column would exceed 18 inches, the office titles may be arranged in parallel vertical columns.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.067. NONALIGNED CANDIDATE DESIGNATED AS INDEPENDENT. In an election in which the candidates' political party alignments are to be printed on the ballot next to the candidates' names, "Independent" shall be printed on the ballot next to the name of each candidate who is not aligned with a political party.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.068. OFFICE TITLE TO APPEAR ON BALLOT IF NO CANDIDATE FOR OFFICE. (a) If no candidate's name is to appear on the ballot for a particular office to be voted on at an election in which write-in votes for the office are permitted by law, the authority responsible for having the official ballot prepared shall have the office title printed on the ballot and shall provide a space for a write-in vote as required by this code. However, in an election in which write-in votes may be counted only for names appearing on a list of write-in candidates, if no candidate's name is to appear on the ballot or the list of write-in candidates for a particular office, the office title is not printed on the ballot.

(b) If the authority fails to have the office title printed on the ballot, a person may not be declared elected to the office because of write-in votes that are cast by writing in the office title and the person's name unless the total number of votes cast for all write-in candidates for that office is more than 50 percent of the total number of voters participating in the election who are eligible to vote for the office.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 497, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 5.09, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 52.069. UNEXPIRED TERM. If an office to be filled for an unexpired term is to be voted on at a general or primary election, "unexpired term" shall be printed on the ballot following the office title.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.070. VOTING SQUARE AND INSTRUCTION FOR CANDIDATES. (a) A shape for voting shall be printed to the left of each candidate's name on a ballot.

(b) Immediately below "OFFICIAL BALLOT," the following instruction shall be printed: "Vote for the candidate of your choice in each race by placing an 'X' or filling in the shape beside the candidate's name."

(c) Appropriate changes in the instruction shall be made if only one race appears on the ballot or if more than one candidate is to be elected in a race.

(d) If more than one candidate is to be elected in any race on the ballot, "Vote for none, one, two, ... or ___" (in the numerical sequence appropriate for the number of candidates to be elected) shall be printed immediately below each office title appearing on the ballot.

(e) A shape shall be printed to the left of each line provided for write-in voting under Section 52.066(c), but failure to place a mark in the shape does not affect the counting of a write-in vote.

(f) Any variation from this instruction must be approved by the secretary of state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 497, Sec. 2, eff. Sept.1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 39, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 52.072. PROPOSITIONS. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the authority ordering the election shall prescribe the wording of a proposition that is to appear on the ballot.

(b) A proposition shall be printed on the ballot in the form of a single statement and may appear on the ballot only once.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), in an election in which an office and a measure are to be voted on, each proposition stating a measure shall appear on the ballot after the listing of offices.

(d) If an election of officers is contingent on the adoption of a proposition appearing on the same ballot, the proposition shall appear on the ballot before the listing of offices.

(e) In addition to any other requirement imposed by law for a proposition, including a provision prescribing the proposition language, a proposition submitted to the voters for approval of the imposition, increase, or reduction of a tax shall specifically state, as applicable:

(1) with respect to a proposition that only seeks voter approval of the imposition or increase of a tax, the amount of or maximum tax rate of the tax or tax increase for which approval is sought; or

(2) with respect to a proposition that only seeks voter approval of the reduction of a tax, the amount of tax rate reduction or the tax rate for which approval is sought.

(f) A political subdivision that submits to the voters a proposition for the approval of the issuance of debt obligations shall prescribe the wording of the proposition that is to appear on the ballot in accordance with the requirements of Subchapter B, Chapter 1251, Government Code. In this subsection, "debt obligation" and "political subdivision" have the meanings assigned by Section 1251.051, Government Code.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 360), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 505 (S.B. 30), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 728 (H.B. 477), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 52.073. VOTING SQUARE AND INSTRUCTION FOR PROPOSITIONS. (a) On a ballot on which a proposition is to appear, "FOR" and, below it, "AGAINST" shall be printed to the left of the proposition.

(b) A brace or other suitable device shall be printed to indicate to which proposition each "FOR" and "AGAINST" applies.

(c) A square for voting shall be printed to the left of each "FOR" and each "AGAINST."

(d) Immediately above the propositions, the following instruction shall be printed: "Place an 'X' in the square beside the statement indicating the way you wish to vote."

(e) The authority responsible for prescribing the wording of a proposition may substitute "YES" and "NO" on the ballot for "FOR" and "AGAINST" if the authority considers those words more appropriate.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.074. PROVISIONAL BALLOT FOR CERTAIN VOTERS. The authority responsible for having the official ballot prepared shall have a provisional ballot prepared in a form approved by the secretary of state for use by a voter who executes an affidavit in accordance with Section 63.011.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1078, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1315, Sec. 18, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Sec. 52.075. MODIFICATION OF BALLOT FORM FOR CERTAIN VOTING SYSTEMS. (a) The secretary of state may prescribe the form and content of a ballot for an election using a voting system, including an electronic voting system or a voting system that uses direct recording electronic voting machines or ballot marking devices, to conform to the formatting requirements of the system.

(b) In this section, "ballot marking device," "direct recording electronic voting machine," "electronic voting system," and "voting system" have the meanings assigned by Section 121.003.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1178 (S.B. 910), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 708 (H.B. 88), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER D. ORDER OF PARTIES, OFFICES, NAMES, AND PROPOSITIONS ON BALLOT

Sec. 52.091. PARTY COLUMNS. (a) Party columns shall be arranged on the ballot in the following order, beginning on the left:

(1) columns of parties with nominees for statewide or district offices;

(2) columns of parties without nominees for statewide or district offices.

(b) Columns of parties specified by Subsection (a)(1) shall be arranged in descending order of the number of votes received statewide by each party's candidate for governor in the most recent gubernatorial general election, beginning on the left with the party whose candidate received the highest number of votes. Columns of parties that did not have a candidate for governor in the most recent gubernatorial general election shall appear after the columns of parties that had a candidate, and the order of their columns shall be determined by a drawing conducted by the secretary of state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.092. OFFICES REGULARLY FILLED AT GENERAL ELECTION FOR STATE AND COUNTY OFFICERS. (a) Except as provided by Section 2.053(c), for an election at which offices regularly filled at the general election for state and county officers are to appear on the ballot, the offices shall be listed in the following order:

(1) offices of the federal government;

(2) offices of the state government:

(A) statewide offices;

(B) district offices;

(3) offices of the county government:

(A) county offices;

(B) precinct offices.

(b) Offices of the federal government shall be listed in the following order:

(1) president and vice-president of the United States;

(2) United States senator;

(3) United States representative.

(c) Statewide offices of the state government shall be listed in the following order:

(1) governor;

(2) lieutenant governor;

(3) attorney general;

(4) comptroller of public accounts;

(5) commissioner of the General Land Office;

(6) commissioner of agriculture;

(7) railroad commissioner;

(8) chief justice, supreme court;

(9) justice, supreme court;

(10) presiding judge, court of criminal appeals;

(11) judge, court of criminal appeals.

(d) District offices of the state government shall be listed in the following order:

(1) member, State Board of Education;

(2) state senator;

(3) state representative;

(4) chief justice, court of appeals;

(5) justice, court of appeals;

(6) district judge;

(7) criminal district judge;

(8) family district judge;

(9) district attorney;

(10) criminal district attorney.

(e) County offices shall be listed in the following order:

(1) county judge;

(2) judge, county court at law;

(3) judge, county criminal court;

(4) judge, county probate court;

(5) county attorney;

(6) district clerk;

(7) district and county clerk;

(8) county clerk;

(9) sheriff;

(10) sheriff and tax assessor-collector;

(11) county tax assessor-collector;

(12) county treasurer;

(13) county school trustee (county with population of 3.3 million or more);

(14) county surveyor.

(f) Precinct offices shall be listed in the following order:

(1) county commissioner;

(2) justice of the peace;

(3) constable.

(g) If two or more offices having the same title except for a place number or other distinguishing number are to appear on the ballot, the number shall appear as part of the office title and the offices shall be listed in numerical order.

(h) Repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 4.

(i) The secretary of state shall designate the position of new offices on the ballot.

(j) The office of judge of a multicounty statutory county court created under Subchapter D, Chapter 25, Government Code, is considered to be a county office for purposes of listing the office on the ballot and to be a district office for all other purposes under this code.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 15(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 746, Sec. 69, eff. Oct. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 6.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 37 (H.B. 328), Sec. 2, eff. May 19, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (S.B. 1016), Sec. 5.32, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 3.05, eff. December 2, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 349 (S.B. 1089), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 52.093. OFFICES OF POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OTHER THAN COUNTY. Except as otherwise provided by law, for an election at which offices of a political subdivision other than a county are to be voted on, the authority ordering the election shall determine the order of the offices on the ballot.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 52.094. NAMES OF CANDIDATES. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, for an election at which the names of more than one candidate for the same office are to appear on the ballot in an independent column or are to appear on a general or special election ballot that does not contain a party nominee, the order of the candidates' names shall be determined by a drawing. The order of the candidates' names on the ballot of any resulting runoff election or election held to resolve a tie vote shall be the relative order of names on the original election ballot.

(b) The authority responsible for having the official ballot prepared for the election shall conduct the drawing.

(c) The authority conducting the drawing shall post in the authority's office a notice of the date, hour, and place of the drawing. The notice must remain posted continuously for 72 hours immediately preceding the scheduled time of the drawing.

(d) The authority conducting the drawing shall provide notice of the date, hour, and place of the drawing to each candidate by:

(1) written notice:

(A) mailed to the address stated on the candidate's application for a place on the ballot, not later than the fourth day before the date of the drawing; or

(B) provided at the time the candidate files an application with the appropriate authority;

(2) telephone, if a telephone number is provided on the candidate's application for a place on the ballot; or

(3) e-mail, if an e-mail address is provided on the candidate's application for a place on the ballot.

(e) Each candidate affected by a drawing is entitled to be present or have a representative present at the drawing.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 52, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 708 (H.B. 88), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 40, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 52.095. PROPOSITIONS. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the authority ordering an election in which more than one measure is to be voted on shall determine the order in which the propositions are to appear on the ballot.

(b) Each political subdivision's proposition on the ballot shall be assigned a unique number or letter on the ballot as follows:

(1) except as provided by Subdivision (2), for each proposition on the ballot, the authority ordering the election shall assign a letter of the alphabet to the measure that corresponds to its order on the ballot; and

(2) for each proposition on the ballot to be voted on statewide, the authority ordering the election shall assign a number to the measure that corresponds to its order on the ballot.

(c) Each proposition on the ballot must identify the name of the authority ordering the election on the measure.

(d) The secretary of state shall prescribe procedures necessary to implement this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 391 (S.B. 957), Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2017.